Louisiana, session 2026, SB114.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:463.243 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§463.243. Special prestige license plate; "Foundation for Moral Law"
A. The secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections
shall establish a special prestige motor vehicle license plate to be known as the
"Foundation for Moral Law" plate, provided there is a minimum of one
thousand applicants for such plate. The plate shall be restricted to use on
passenger cars, pickup trucks, recreational vehicles, motorcycles, and vans.
B. The secretary shall determine the design of the plate issued under the
provisions of this Section. The design shall include the words "Foundation for
Moral Law" and the plate shall be issued, upon application, to any citizen of
Louisiana in the same manner as any other motor vehicle license plate when the
applicable statutory provisions are met and the department's electronic vehicle
and title registration system is updated to accommodate the creation of new
plates.
C. The charge for the special license plate shall be the regular motor
vehicle registration license fee charged under the provisions of R.S. 47:463.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 114 ENROLLED
D. The secretary shall promulgate and adopt rules and regulations as are
necessary to implement the provisions of this Section.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.